Utah statutes.
70A-7a-201.   Person that may issue a warehouse receipt -- Storage under
bond.
(1)  A warehouse receipt may be issued by any warehouse.
(2)  If goods, including distilled spirits and agricultural commodities, are
stored under a statute requiring a bond against withdrawal or a license for
the issuance of receipts in the nature of warehouse receipts, a receipt issued
for the goods is considered to be a warehouse receipt even if issued by a
person that is the owner of the goods and is not a warehouse.
